North Dakota, session 69, SB2219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 54-24-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Disburse surplus library materials to libraries throughout the state.
SECTION 2. A new subsection to section 54-24.2-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Complete and submit the annual report required under section 54 - 24.2 - 06 for the previous
calendar year.

S. B. NO. 2219 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2219.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State